Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-117.01
Subpoenas; issuance; witnesses; documents.

In the discharge of any duty herein imposed the commission shall have authority to issue subpoenas and to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of any papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony.

Laws 1959, c. 245, § 2, p. 844.